Florida, session 2026, HB711.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 395.1075, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb711-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 711 2026
to read:
395.1075 Central service technician services.—
(1) LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE AND INTENT.—The legislative
purpose for enacting this section is to ensure that every new
central service technician employed by a hospital or an
ambulatory surgical center in this state meets minimum
requirements for safe practice as a member of the surgical care
team. It is the intent of the Legislature that central service
technicians who fall below minimum competency or who otherwise
present a danger to public health and safety be prohibited from
practicing in this state.
(2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Central service technician" means a person who
decontaminates, inspects, assembles, disassembles, packages, and
sterilizes reusable medical instruments or devices for use in a
licensed facility.
(b) "Health care practitioner" has the same meaning as in
s. 456.001.
(3) CERTIFICATION AND CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS
FOR CENTRAL SERVICE TECHNICIANS.—
(a) A licensed facility shall employ or otherwise retain
the services of a central service technician only if such person
has successfully passed a nationally accredited exam for central
service technicians and meets at least one of the following
criteria:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb711-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 711 2026
1. Holds and maintains a certified registered central
service technician credential issued by a nationally accredited
central service credentialing organization.
2. Holds and maintains a certified sterile processing and
distribution technician credential issued by a nationally
accredited central service credentialing organization.
3. Provides evidence that he or she was employed by or
provided services of a central service technician to a licensed
facility on or before December 31, 2026.
(b) A central service technician who does not meet the
requirements of paragraph (a) must obtain the required certified
registered central service technician credential or certified
sterile processing and distribution technician credential within
18 months after his or her date of hire in order to continue
employment as a central service technician.
(c) A person who qualifies under paragraph (a) to practice
as a central service technician in a licensed facility must
annually complete at least 10 hours of continuing education
credits to continue employment as a central service technician.
The continuing education must be related to the functions of a
central service technician.
(d) A licensed facility shall, upon the written request of
a central service technician, verify, in writing, the central
service technician's dates of employment or the contract period
during which the central service technician provided services to
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb711-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 711 2026
the licensed facility.
(4) EXEMPTIONS.—This section does not apply to:
(a) A health care practitioner if he or she is acting
within the scope of his or her license or certification.
(b) A student or an intern if he or she is performing the
functions of a central service technician under the direct
supervision of a health care practitioner as part of the
student's or intern's training or internship.
(c) A person who holds and maintains a registration,
certification, or license from a nationally accredited
credentialing organization to perform health services.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb711-00